District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.21

Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund.

(a)

There is established a nonlapsing fund to be designated as the Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund (“Fund”), which shall be a segregated account within the General Fund of the District of Columbia and shall be used to support the activities prescribed by the Memorandum of Understanding, effective January 1, 2002, between the United States Marshals Service and the Department of Corrections (“Memorandum”).

(b)

All revenue derived from the reimbursement of the cost of services provided by the Department of Corrections pursuant to the Memorandum, and all fees collected for the department’s housing, transporting, and handling of adult pretrial or sentenced felons, probation, parole, or supervision violators, and prisoners returning to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on writ or subject to other commitment orders shall be deposited into the Fund.

(c)

Funds deposited in the Fund shall not revert to the fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in this section, subject to authorization by Congress.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3032, 52 DCR 7503

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3032 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle C of title III of Law 16-33: Section 3031 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle C of title III of the act may be cited as the Department of Corrections Reimbursement Fund Act of 2005.